Missouri, session 2026, HB2145.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 226.510, 226.540, and 226.550, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 71.025, 226.510, 226.540, and
226.550, to read as follows:
71.025. Beginning August 28, 2026, city populations shall be included on city
limit signs on state highways.
226.510. As used in sections 226.500 to 226.600, the following words or phrases
mean:
(1) "Freeway primary highway", that part of a federal-aid primary highway system, as
of June 1, 1991, which has been constructed as divided, dual lane fully controlled access
facilities with no access to the throughways except the established interchanges. When
existing two-lane highways are being upgraded to four-lane limited access, the regulations for
freeway primary highways shall apply as of the date the state highways and transportation
commission acquires all access rights on the adjoining right-of-way;
(2) "Interstate system", that portion of the national system of interstate highways
located within the boundaries of Missouri, as officially designated or may be hereafter
designated by the state highways and transportation commission with the approval of the
Secretary of Transportation, pursuant to Title 23, United States Code, as amended;
(3) "Outdoor advertising", an outdoor sign, display, device, figure, painting, drawing,
message, plaque, poster, billboard, or other thing designed, intended or used to advertise or
inform, any part of the advertising or information contents of which is visible from any point
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2145 2
of the traveled ways of the interstate or primary systems, except that none of the
preceding items shall be deemed "outdoor advertising" when located on, attached to, or
erected as part of, a fence, fences, or walls that enclose, in whole or in part, an athletic
field that is owned or leased by a school or an entity described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended. When the audience of such signs is intended to be
the patrons, participants, or attendees of an event occurring at the athletic field, the
signs shall not require permitting from the Missouri department of transportation;
(4) "Primary system", the federal-aid primary highways as of June 1, 1991, and all
highways designated as part of the National Highway System by the National Highway
System Designation Act of 1995 and those highways subsequently designated as part of the
National Highway System;
(5) "Rest area", an area or site established and maintained within or adjacent to the
highway right-of-way under public supervision or control, for the convenience of the
traveling public, except that the term shall not include automotive service stations, hotels,
motels, restaurants or other commerce facilities of like nature;
(6) "Urban area", an urban place as designated by the Bureau of the Census, having a
population of five thousand or more within boundaries to be fixed by the state highways and
transportation commission and local officials in cooperation with each other and approved by
the Secretary of Transportation, or an urbanized area as designated by the Bureau of the
Census within boundaries to be fixed by the state highways and transportation commission
and local officials and approved by the Secretary of Transportation. The boundary of the
urban area shall, as a minimum, encompass the entire urban place as designated by the Bureau
of the Census.
226.540. Notwithstanding any other provisions of sections 226.500 to 226.600,
outdoor advertising shall be permitted within six hundred and sixty feet of the nearest edge of
the right-of-way of highways located on the interstate, federal-aid primary system as it existed
on June 1, 1991, or the national highway system as amended in areas zoned industrial,
commercial or the like and in unzoned commercial and industrial areas as defined in this
section, subject to the following regulations which are consistent with customary use in this
state:
(1) Lighting:
(a) No revolving or rotating beam or beacon of light that simulates any emergency
light or device shall be permitted as part of any sign. No flashing, intermittent, or moving
light or lights will be permitted except scoreboards and other illuminated signs designating
public service information, such as time, date, or temperature, or similar information, will be
allowed; tri-vision, projection, and other changeable message signs shall be allowed subject
to Missouri highways and transportation commission regulations;

HCS HB 2145 3
(b) External lighting, such as floodlights, thin line and gooseneck reflectors are
permitted, provided the light source is directed upon the face of the sign and is effectively
shielded so as to prevent beams or rays of light from being directed into any portion of the
main traveled way of the federal-aid primary highways as of June 1, 1991, and all highways
designated as part of the National Highway System by the National Highway System
Designation Act of 1995 and those highways subsequently designated as part of the National
Highway System and the lights are not of such intensity so as to cause glare, impair the vision
of the driver of a motor vehicle, or otherwise interfere with a driver's operation of a motor
vehicle;
(c) No sign shall be so illuminated that it interferes with the effectiveness of, or
obscures, an official traffic sign, device, or signal;
(2) Size of signs:
(a) The maximum area for any one sign shall be eight hundred square feet with a
maximum height of thirty feet and a maximum length of seventy-two feet, inclusive of border
and trim but excluding the base or apron, supports, and other structural members. The area
shall be measured as established herein and in rules promulgated by the commission. In
determining the size of a conforming or nonconforming sign structure, temporary cutouts and
extensions installed for the length of a specific display contract shall not be considered a
substantial increase to the size of the permanent display; provided the actual square footage of
such temporary cutouts or extensions may not exceed thirty-three percent of the permanent
display area. Signs erected in accordance with the provisions of sections 226.500 to 226.600
prior to August 28, 2002, which fail to meet the requirements of this provision shall be
deemed legally nonconforming as defined herein;
(b) The maximum size limitations shall apply to each side of a sign structure, and
signs may be placed back to back, double faced, or in V-type construction with not more than
two displays to each facing, but such sign structure shall be considered as one sign;
(c) After August 28, 1999, no new sign structure shall be erected in which two or
more displays are stacked one above the other. Stacked structures existing on or before
August 28, 1999, in accordance with sections 226.500 to 226.600 shall be deemed legally
nonconforming and may be maintained in accordance with the provisions of sections 226.500
to 226.600. Structures displaying more than one display on a horizontal basis shall be
allowed, provided that total display areas do not exceed the maximum allowed square footage
for a sign structure pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
(3) Spacing of signs:
(a) On all interstate highways, freeways, and nonfreeway federal-aid primary
highways as of June 1, 1991, and all highways designated as part of the National Highway

HCS HB 2145 4
System by the National Highway System Designation Act of 1995 and those highways
subsequently designated as part of the National Highway System:
a. No sign structure shall be erected within one thousand four hundred feet of an
existing sign on the same side of the highway;
b. Outside of incorporated municipalities, no structure may be located adjacent to or
within five hundred feet of an interchange, intersection at grade, or safety rest area. Such five
hundred feet shall be measured from the beginning or ending of the pavement widening at the
exit from or entrance to the main traveled way. For purpose of this subparagraph, the term
"incorporated municipalities" shall include "urban areas", except that such "urban areas" shall
not be considered "incorporated municipalities" if it is finally determined that such would
have the effect of making Missouri be in noncompliance with the requirements of Title 23,
United States Code, Section 131;
(b) The spacing between structure provisions of this subdivision do not apply to signs
which are separated by buildings, natural surroundings, or other obstructions in such manner
that only one sign facing located within such distance is visible at any one time. Directional
or other official signs or those advertising the sale or lease of the property on which they are
located, or those which advertise activities on the property on which they are located,
including products sold, shall not be counted, nor shall measurements be made from them for
the purpose of compliance with spacing provisions;
(c) No sign shall be located in such manner as to obstruct or otherwise physically
interfere with the effectiveness of an official traffic sign, signal, or device or obstruct or
physically interfere with a motor vehicle operator's view of approaching, merging, or
intersecting traffic;
(d) The measurements in this section shall be the minimum distances between
outdoor advertising sign structures measured along the nearest edge of the pavement between
points directly opposite the signs along each side of the highway and shall apply only to
outdoor advertising sign structures located on the same side of the highway involved;
(4) As used in this section, the words "unzoned commercial and industrial land" shall
be defined as follows: that area not zoned by state or local law or ordinance and on which
there is located one or more permanent structures used for a commercial business or industrial
activity or on which a commercial or industrial activity is actually conducted together with
the area along the highway extending outwardly seven hundred fifty feet from and beyond the
edge of such activity. All measurements shall be from the outer edges of the regularly used
improvements, buildings, parking lots, landscaped, storage or processing areas of the
commercial or industrial activity and along and parallel to the edge of the pavement of the
highway. On nonfreeway primary highways where there is an unzoned commercial or
industrial area on one side of the road in accordance with this section, the unzoned

HCS HB 2145 5
commercial or industrial area shall also include those lands located on the opposite side
of the highway to the extent of the same dimensions. Unzoned land shall not include:
(a) Land on the opposite side of the highway from an unzoned commercial or
industrial area as defined in this section and located adjacent to highways located on the
interstate[, federal-aid primary system as it existed on June 1, 1991, or the national highway
system as amended, unless the opposite side of the highway qualifies as a separate unzoned
commercial or industrial area] or freeway primary highways; or
(b) Land zoned by a state or local law, regulation, or ordinance;
(5) "Commercial or industrial activities" as used in this section means those which are
generally recognized as commercial or industrial by zoning authorities in this state, except
that none of the following shall be considered commercial or industrial:
(a) Outdoor advertising structures;
100 (b) Agricultural, forestry, ranching, grazing, farming, and related activities, including
101 seasonal roadside fresh produce stands;
102 (c) Transient or temporary activities;
103 (d) Activities more than six hundred sixty feet from the nearest edge of the right-of-
104 way or not visible from the main traveled way;
105 (e) Activities conducted in a building principally used as a residence;
106 (f) Railroad tracks and minor sidings;
107 (6) The words "unzoned commercial or industrial land" shall also include all areas not
108 specified in this section which constitute an "unzoned commercial or industrial area" within
109 the meaning of the present Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, or as such
110 statute may be amended. As used in this section, the words "zoned commercial or industrial
111 area" shall refer to those areas zoned commercial or industrial by the duly constituted zoning
112 authority of a municipality, county, or other lawfully established political subdivision of the
113 state, or by the state and which is within seven hundred fifty feet of one or more permanent
114 commercial or industrial activities. Commercial or industrial activities as used in this section
115 are limited to those activities:
116 (a) In which the primary use of the property is commercial or industrial in nature;
117 (b) Which are clearly visible from the highway and recognizable as a commercial
118 business;
119 (c) Which are permanent as opposed to temporary or transitory and of a nature that
120 would customarily be restricted to commercial or industrial zoning in areas comprehensively
121 zoned; and
122 (d) In determining whether the primary use of the property is commercial or industrial
123 pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the state highways and transportation
124 commission shall consider the following factors:

HCS HB 2145 6
125 a. The presence of a permanent and substantial building;
126 b. The existence of utilities and local business licenses, if any, for the commercial
127 activity;
128 c. On-premise signs or other identification;
129 d. The presence of an owner or employee on the premises for at least twenty hours per
130 week;
131 (7) In zoned commercial and industrial areas, whenever a state, county or municipal
132 zoning authority has adopted laws or ordinances which include regulations with respect to the
133 size, lighting and spacing of signs, which regulations are consistent with the intent of sections
134 226.500 to 226.600 and with customary use, then from and after the effective date of such
135 regulations, and so long as they shall continue in effect, the provisions of this section shall not
136 apply to the erection of signs in such areas. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this
137 section, after August 28, 1992, with respect to any outdoor advertising which is regulated by
138 the provisions of subdivision (1), (3) or (4) of section 226.520 or subsection 1 of section
139 226.527:
140 (a) No county or municipality shall issue a permit to allow a regulated sign to be
141 newly erected without a permit issued by the state highways and transportation commission;
142 (b) A county or municipality may charge a reasonable one-time permit or inspection
143 fee to assure compliance with local wind load and electrical requirements when the sign is
144 first erected, but a county or municipality may not charge a permit or inspection fee for such
145 sign after such initial fee. Changing the display face or performing routine maintenance shall
146 not be considered as erecting a new sign;
147 (8) The state highways and transportation commission on behalf of the state of
148 Missouri, may seek agreement with the Secretary of Transportation of the United States under
149 Section 131 of Title 23, United States Code, as amended, that sections 226.500 to 226.600 are
150 in conformance with that Section 131 and provides effective control of outdoor advertising
151 signs as set forth therein. If such agreement cannot be reached and the penalties under
152 subsection (b) of Section 131 are invoked, the attorney general of this state shall institute
153 proceedings described in subsection (1) of that Section 131.
226.550. 1. No outdoor advertising which is regulated by subdivision (1), (3) or (4)
of section 226.520 or subsection 1 of section 226.527 shall be erected or maintained on or
after August 28, 1992, without a one-time permanent permit issued by the state highways and
transportation commission. Application for permits shall be made to the state highways and
transportation commission on forms furnished by the commission and shall be accompanied
by a permit fee of two hundred dollars for all signs; except that, tax-exempt religious
organizations as defined in subdivision (11) of section 313.005, service organizations as
defined in subdivision (12) of section 313.005, veterans' organizations as defined in

HCS HB 2145 7
subdivision (14) of section 313.005, and fraternal organizations as defined in subdivision (8)
of section 313.005 shall be granted a permit for signs less than seventy-six square feet without
payment of the fee. The permit fee of two hundred dollars shall be waived for
landowners, provided that the landowner is the permit holder and owns both the land
upon which the outdoor advertising is placed and the business being advertised on the
sign, so long as the business being advertised is located within seven hundred fifty feet of
the sign location. In the event a permit holder fails to erect a sign structure within twenty-
four months of issuance, said permit shall expire and a new permit must be obtained prior to
any construction.
2. No outdoor advertising which is regulated by subdivision (1), (3) or (4) of section
226.520 or subsection 1 of section 226.527 which was erected prior to August 28, 1992, shall
be maintained without a one-time permanent permit for outdoor advertising issued by the
state highways and transportation commission. If a one-time permanent permit was issued by
the state highways and transportation commission after March 30, 1972, and before August
28, 1992, it is not necessary for a new permit to be issued. If a one-time permanent permit
was not issued for a lawfully erected and lawfully existing sign by the state highways and
transportation commission after March 30, 1972, and before August 28, 1992, a one-time
permanent permit shall be issued by the commission for each sign which is lawfully in
existence on the day prior to August 28, 1992, upon application and payment of a permit fee
of two hundred dollars. All applications and fees due pursuant to this subsection shall be
submitted before December 31, 1992. The permit fee of two hundred dollars shall be
waived for landowners, provided that the landowner is the permit holder and owns both
the land upon which the outdoor advertising is placed and the business being advertised
on the sign, so long as the business being advertised is located within seven hundred fifty
feet of the sign location.
3. For purposes of sections 226.500 to 226.600, the terminology "structure lawfully in
existence" or "lawfully existing" sign or outdoor advertising shall, nevertheless, include the
following signs unless the signs violate the provisions of subdivisions (3) to (7) of subsection
1 of section 226.580:
(1) All signs erected prior to January 1, 1968;
(2) All signs erected before March 30, 1972, but on or after January 1, 1968, which
would otherwise be lawful but for the failure to have a permit for such signs prior to March
30, 1972, except that any sign or structure which was not in compliance with sizing, spacing,
lighting, or location requirements of sections 226.500 to 226.600 as the sections appeared in
the revised statutes of Missouri 1969, wheresoever located, shall not be considered a lawfully
existing sign or structure;

HCS HB 2145 8
(3) All signs erected after March 30, 1972, which are in conformity with sections
226.500 to 226.600;
(4) All signs erected in compliance with sections 226.500 to 226.600 prior to August
28, 2002.
4. On or after August 28, 1992, the state highways and transportation commission
may, in addition to the fees authorized by subsections 1 and 2 of this section, collect a
biennial inspection fee every two years after a state permit has been issued. Biennial
inspection fees due after August 28, 2002, and prior to August 28, 2003, shall be fifty dollars.
Biennial inspection fees due on or after August 28, 2003, shall be seventy-five dollars.
Biennial inspection fees due on or after August 28, 2004, shall be one hundred dollars; except
that, tax-exempt religious organizations as defined in subdivision (11) of section 313.005,
service organizations as defined in subdivision (12) of section 313.005, veterans'
organizations as defined in subdivision (14) of section 313.005, and fraternal organizations
as defined in subdivision (8) of section 313.005 shall not be required to pay such fee. The
biennial inspection fee shall be waived for landowners, provided that the landowner is
the permit holder and owns both the land upon which the outdoor advertising is placed
and the business being advertised on the sign, so long as the business being advertised is
located within seven hundred fifty feet of the sign location.
5. In order to effect the more efficient collection of biennial inspection fees, the state
highways and transportation commission is encouraged to adopt a renewal system in which
all permits in a particular county are renewed in the same month. In conjunction with the
conversion to this renewal system, the state highways and transportation commission is
specifically authorized to prorate renewal fees based on changes in renewal dates.
6. Sign owners or owners of the land on which signs are located must apply to the
state highways and transportation commission for biennial inspection and submit any fees as
required by this section on or before December 31, 1992. For a permitted sign which does not
have a permit, a permit shall be issued at the time of the next biennial inspection.
7. The state highways and transportation commission shall deposit all fees received
for outdoor advertising permits and inspection fees in the state road fund, keeping a separate
record of such fees, and the same may be expended by the commission in the administration
of sections 226.500 to 226.600.
✔